District of Columbia statutes.
38-213

Court jurisdiction.

The Family Division of the Superior Court is hereby given jurisdiction in all cases arising under this subchapter.

Feb. 4, 1925, 43 Stat. 808, ch. 140, Art. III, § 3
May 29, 1928, 45 Stat. 1006, ch. 908, § 26
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 578, Pub. L. 91-358, title I,§ 159(g)
1973 Ed., § 31-213.
1981 Ed., § 31-413.
2001 Ed., § 38-209.